New Mexico, session 2026, HB97.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION.-- A. One hundred sixty-five thousand dollars ($165,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the department of health for expenditure in fiscal year 2027 to: (1) update training and education materials for shaken baby syndrome and abusive head trauma prevention in a manner that is consistent with rules promulgated by the department of health and standards established by the university of New Mexico department of pediatrics; (2) fully implement shaken baby syndrome and abusive head trauma training and education programs in hospitals and birthing centers throughout the state; and (3) provide for statewide reporting of incidences of abusive head trauma. B. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027 shall revert to the general fund. - 2 -